New York, session 2025-2026, A1640.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The real property law is amended by adding a new section 2 238-b to read as follows: 3 § 238-b. Replacement door locks for victims of domestic violence. 1. 4 Where a tenant has a lock installed and maintained by their landlord for 5 the entrance door of their dwelling unit, and such tenant or a member of 6 such tenant's household is a victim of domestic violence, as defined by 7 section four hundred fifty-nine-a of the social services law, and 8 reasonably fears potential further domestic violence, such tenant may 9 request that the lock be replaced. A tenant requesting such an accommo- 10 dation shall provide an attestation in writing that they would like the 11 lock replaced due to their status as a victim of domestic violence and 12 that they reasonably fear potential further domestic violence. Any land- 13 lord who receives a request pursuant to this subdivision shall comply 14 with the request within twenty-four hours of receipt. A landlord may 15 request documentation demonstrating that the tenant or a member of the 16 tenant's household has been a victim of domestic violence. Such 17 documentation shall include, but not be limited to, a temporary or final 18 order of protection issued by a court of competent jurisdiction, or a 19 record, complaint, or report from a federal, state, or local law 20 enforcement agency of an act of domestic violence as described in 21 section four hundred fifty-nine-a of the social services law or a family EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03946-02-6 A. 1640--A 2 1 offense as described in section eight hundred twelve of the family court 2 act, or certifying that the tenant or a member of the tenant's household 3 has been subjected to domestic violence. 4 2. If a landlord fails to replace the lock within twenty-four hours of 5 a request being made, the tenant may change the lock without the land- 6 lord's permission and may deduct the cost from a future payment of rent. 7 If the tenant changes the lock, the tenant shall promptly provide a key 8 to the new lock to the landlord. 9 3. The landlord shall not require the tenant to pay any additional 10 rent, deposit or fee for the replacement of locks. 11 4. A landlord who violates the provisions of this section shall be 12 subject to a civil penalty in an amount to be as follows: 13 (a) one hundred dollars for failure to replace such lock within twen- 14 ty-four hours of the request; 15 (b) two hundred fifty dollars for failure to replace such lock within 16 forty-eight hours of the request; and 17 (c) five hundred dollars for each subsequent twenty-four hours after 18 the initial forty-eight hours since the request until such lock is 19 replaced. 20 5. This section shall only apply when the perpetrator is not a lawful 21 occupant of the dwelling unit for which the lock replacement request is 22 made. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.